Utah statutes.
3-1-32.   Notice to members and shareholders of meeting to vote on plan of
merger or consolidation.
(1)  After approval of the plan under Section 3-1-31, the members or
shareholders shall vote on the plan at an annual or special meeting.
(2)  The members shall be given written notice  specifying:
(a)  the place, date, and time of the meeting;
(b)  whether the meeting is an annual or a special meeting; and
(c)  that a purpose of the meeting is to consider and vote upon the plan of
merger or consolidation.
(3)  The notice shall be delivered:
(a)  at least 20 but not more than 90 days before the date of the meeting;
(b)  either personally or by mail, at the  discretion of the president,
chairman, or secretary of the association or corporation;
(c)  to each current member entitled to vote under the articles of
incorporation or bylaws of each party to the merger or consolidation, if the
party is a cooperative having members; and
(d)  to each shareholder entitled to vote under the articles of incorporation
or bylaws, of each party to the merger or consolidation having shareholders or
stockholders, if the party is not a cooperative.
(4) (a)  If mailed, notice shall be  considered to be delivered when deposited
in the United States mail, addressed to the member or shareholder at his
address as it appears on the membership books or stock transfer books of the
association or corporation, with postage prepaid.
(b) (i)  The notice shall include a copy or a summary of the plan of merger or
consolidation.
(ii)  If a summary is provided, the notice shall state that a copy of the plan
of merger or consolidation will be furnished to any member or shareholder upon
request and without charge.
